Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Penalties

183.990.
Penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter with respect to operation of aircraft, or violating the provisions of any rule, regulation, or ordinance adopted under KRS 183.133(6), shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned not more than ninety (90) days or both.

Each violation of the statutes pertaining to the state airport zoning commission or of any order, rule, or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto shall be punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days or both and each day a violation continues to exist shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS

183.886

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than ten (10) nor more than ninety (90) days, or both.

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS

183.086

or 183.887(2) shall be guilty of:

A Class A misdemeanor; or

A Class D felony, if the violation causes a significant change of course or a serious disruption to the safe travel of the aircraft that threatens the physical safety of the passengers and crew of the aircraft.

HISTORY:

165-56: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 147, § 12; 1946, ch. 49, § 7; 1958, ch. 153, § 48; 1960, ch. 179, § 82; 1964, ch. 134, § 25; 1976, ch. 300, § 8(2); 1996, ch. 174, § 12, effective July 15, 1996; 2015 ch. 114, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 153, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Moreland, Criminal Jurisdiction of Kentucky Courts: A Tentative Codification, 47 Ky. L.J. 7 (1958).